Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 138.912, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment. The healthy eating, here at home program is established to provide incentives for low-income Minnesotans to use federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP)new text begin or Summer EBTnew text end benefits for healthy purchases at Minnesota-based farmers' markets, mobile markets, and direct-farmer sales, including community-supported agriculture shares. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 138.912, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. (b) "Healthy eating, here at home" means a program administered by the deleted text begin Minnesota Humanities Centerdeleted text end new text begin Department of Healthnew text end to provide incentives for low-income Minnesotans to use SNAPnew text begin or Summer EBTnew text end benefits for healthy purchases at Minnesota-based farmers' markets. (c) "Healthy purchases" means SNAP-eligible foods. (d) "Minnesota-based farmers' market" means a physical market as defined in section 28A.151, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), and also includes mobile markets and direct-farmer sales, including through a community-supported agriculture model. (e) "Voucher" means a physical or electronic credit. (f) "Eligible household" means an individual or family that is determined to be a recipient of SNAPnew text begin or Summer EBTnew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 138.912, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Grants. The deleted text begin Minnesota Humanities Centerdeleted text end new text begin Department of Healthnew text end shall allocate grant funds to nonprofit organizations that work with Minnesota-based farmers' markets to provide up to $10 vouchers to SNAPnew text begin or Summer EBTnew text end participants who use electronic benefits transfer (EBT) cards for healthy purchases. Funds may also be provided for vouchers distributed through nonprofit organizations engaged in healthy cooking and food education outreach to eligible households for use at farmers' markets. Funds appropriated under this section may not be used for healthy cooking classes or food education outreach. When awarding grants, the deleted text begin Minnesota Humanities Centerdeleted text end new text begin Department of Healthnew text end must consider how the nonprofit organizations will achieve geographic balance, including specific efforts to reach eligible households across the state, and the organizations' capacity to manage the programming and outreach. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 138.912, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Household eligibility; participation. To be eligible for a healthy eating, here at home voucher, an eligible household must meet the Minnesota SNAPnew text begin or Summer EBTnew text end eligibility requirements under section 142F.10. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 138.912, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Program reporting. The nonprofit organizations that receive grant funds must report annually to the deleted text begin Minnesota Humanities Centerdeleted text end new text begin Department of Healthnew text end with information regarding the operation of the program, including the number of vouchers issued and the number of people served. To the extent practicable, the nonprofit organizations must report on the usage of the vouchers and evaluate the program's effectiveness. Sec. 6. new text begin FRESH BUCKS PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) The fresh bucks pilot program is established by the Department of Health to help Minnesotans participating in SNAP or Summer EBT purchase fresh produce from retailers to support a more nutritious diet. new text end new text begin (b) Under this program, eligible households may use EBT cards at SNAP retailers to receive a dollar-for-dollar match on the purchase of produce up to a $20 match per day per eligible household, with a monthly limit of $80 per eligible household. This program is available until the appropriation is expended. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Department" means the Department of Health. new text end new text begin (c) "Eligible household" means an individual or family that is determined to be a recipient of SNAP or Summer EBT. new text end new text begin (d) "Nonprofit organization" means a nonprofit organization chosen by the department to assist with the administration of the fresh bucks pilot program. new text end new text begin (e) "Produce" means fresh whole or cut fruits and vegetables without added sugars, fats, oils, or salt. new text end new text begin (f) "Program" means the fresh bucks pilot program. new text end new text begin (g) "SNAP retailer" means grocery stores, small food retailers, gas stations, and other entities that have been selected to participate in the program. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Program administration. new text end new text begin The nonprofit organization, under the review and guidance of the department, shall implement the program by: new text end new text begin (1) developing and issuing program guidelines; new text end new text begin (2) creating a process for selecting SNAP retailers using the criteria in subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (3) reviewing and accepting applications for the program; new text end new text begin (4) establishing monitoring and accountability mechanisms to ensure the funds from the program are used to support the purposes of the program; new text end new text begin (5) establishing a system for reimbursing SNAP retailers in a timely manner, considering any specific needs or circumstances of the SNAP retailer based on size or other factors; new text end new text begin (6) regularly monitoring the balance of the program funds to ensure that no SNAP retailer reimbursements combined with any other program-related expenses exceed the amount appropriated for the program; and new text end new text begin (7) establishing additional guidelines to implement the program as the nonprofit organization deems reasonable. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin SNAP retailer selection criteria. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible to participate in the program, SNAP retailers must meet the following minimum criteria: new text end new text begin (1) accept expenditures of benefits provided by SNAP in accordance with United States Code, title 7, section 2011, and Summer EBT; new text end new text begin (2) be in good standing with SNAP and Summer EBT; new text end new text begin (3) demonstrate the capacity to successfully implement the program; new text end new text begin (4) commit to begin offering the program to eligible households no later than 90 days from the date the retailer receives notice of approval to participate in the program; new text end new text begin (5) agree to comply with all data collection and reporting requirements established by the department or other state agency; new text end new text begin (6) agree to cooperate with efforts to market the program; and new text end new text begin (7) agree to cooperate with any audit or investigation to protect against the fraudulent use of funds under this section that is conducted by a nonprofit organization, department, or other state agency. new text end new text begin (b) The department and nonprofit organization shall consider the following criteria: new text end new text begin (1) the geographic diversity of the participating SNAP retailer and its participating stores; new text end new text begin (2) a demonstrated commitment to carrying locally grown food, when possible; and new text end new text begin (3) any other criteria that the department or nonprofit organization determines necessary and consistent with the purposes of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Waiver request. new text end new text begin The commissioner of children, youth, and families must submit a waiver request to the United States Department of Agriculture seeking approval for the inclusion of SNAP retailers in this program so that SNAP and Summer EBT participants receive a discount for produce. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By ......., the department, in collaboration with the nonprofit organization and any other contracted entity, shall submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health containing the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the number of retailers participating and the retailers' geographic distribution; new text end new text begin (2) the demographics of the areas and individuals served; new text end new text begin (3) the costs associated with the program; and new text end new text begin (4) any other information the department determines useful or relevant to understanding the reach and effectiveness of the program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; HEALTHY EATING, HERE AT HOME; FRESH BUCKS PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the healthy eating, here at home program under section 1. new text end new text begin (b) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the fresh bucks pilot program under section 6. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin TRANSFER OF PROGRAM.new text end new text begin The healthy eating, here at home program is transferred from the Minnesota Humanities Center to the Department of Health on July 1, 2025. The provisions of Minnesota Statutes, section 15.039, apply to this transfer. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall renumber Minnesota Statutes, section 138.912, as section 144.0554. The revisor shall make any cross-reference changes necessary resulting from the renumbering of the healthy eating, here at home program. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 138.912, subdivision 7, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-02204 138.912 HEALTHY EATING, HERE AT HOME. Subd. 7. Grocery inclusion. The commissioner of children, youth, and families must submit a waiver request to the federal United States Department of Agriculture seeking approval for the inclusion of Minnesota grocery stores in this program so that SNAP participants may use the vouchers for healthy produce at grocery stores. Grocery store participation is voluntary and a grocery store's associated administrative costs will not be reimbursed.